Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-4404
Applicability of other statutes.

The Nebraska Right to Farm Act shall not affect the application of state and federal statutes.

Laws 1982, LB 668, § 4;

Laws 2019, LB227, § 2.